Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-919
Instructional activities, defined.

Instructional activities shall mean those degree-credit and non-degree-credit courses and programs delivered to complete specific degree and nondegree learner objectives.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 3.